Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 202546-1502
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Wellhead Protection Area Act:

(1) Controlling entity means a city, a village, a natural resources district, a rural water district, any other entity, including, but not limited to, a privately owned public water supply system, or any combination thereof operating under an agreement pursuant to the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act that operates a public water supply system;

(2) Department means the Department of Water, Energy, and Environment;

(3) Director means the Director of Water, Energy, and Environment; and

(4) Wellhead protection area means the surface and subsurface area surrounding a water well or well field, supplying a public water system, through which contaminants are reasonably likely to move toward and reach such water well or well field.

Laws 1998, LB 1161, § 3;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 73;

Laws 2019, LB302, § 52;

Laws 2025, LB317, § 270.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.